Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 480.40, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section and section 480.45, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Judicial official" means: (1) every Minnesota district court judge, senior judge, retired judge, and every judge of the Minnesota Court of Appeals and every active, senior, recalled, or retired federal judge who resides in Minnesota; (2) a justice of the Minnesota Supreme Court; (3) employees of the Minnesota judicial branch; (4) judicial referees and magistrate judges; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (5) current and retired judges and current employees of the Office of Administrative Hearings, Workers' Compensation Court of Appeals, and Tax Courtnew text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (6) Minnesota county attorneys and employees within a Minnesota county attorney's officenew text end . (c) "Personal information" does not include publicly available information. Personal information means: (1) a residential address of a judicial official; (2) a residential address of the spouse, domestic partner, or children of a judicial official; (3) a nonjudicial branch issued telephone number or email address of a judicial official; (4) the name of any child of a judicial official; and (5) the name of any child care facility or school that is attended by a child of a judicial official if combined with an assertion that the named facility or school is attended by the child of a judicial official. (d) "Publicly available information" means information that is lawfully made available through federal, state, or local government records or information that a business has a reasonable basis to believe is lawfully made available to the general public through widely distributed media, by a judicial official, or by a person to whom the judicial official has disclosed the information, unless the judicial official has restricted the information to a specific audience. (e) "Law enforcement support organizations" do not include charitable organizations.